Hawaii statutes.
[§256-7] Tax reporting. The director
of finance or the program manager of the college savings program, or a
designee, shall file a report annually, with the director of taxation, setting
forth the names and identification numbers of account owners, designated
beneficiaries, and distributees of college accounts, the amounts contributed to
the accounts, the amounts distributed from the accounts, and the nature of the
distributions as qualified withdrawals or as withdrawals other than qualified
withdrawals, and any other information that the director of taxation may
require regarding the taxation under this chapter of amounts contributed to or
withdrawn from the accounts. [L 1999, c 81, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next